Louisiana, session 2026, SB287.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:1389(B), 1393.1(E)(6), (F)(4), the introductory paragraph of
1393.1(H), and 1393.1(H)(1), (2), (3), and (6) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
6:1389(C), (D), and (E) and 1393.1(E)(7) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1389. Virtual currency kiosks; maximum daily transaction limit; cancellation and
refund
* * *
B.(1) The owner or operator of a virtual currency kiosk shall wait
seventy-two hours before processing a user's virtual currency kiosk transaction or
shall, at such owner's or operator's cost and within seventy-two hours after a virtual
currency kiosk transaction, allow the user to cancel and receive a full refund for the
virtual currency kiosk transaction.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection
or any other provision of law to the contrary, the owner or operator of a virtual
currency kiosk shall, at the owner or operator's cost, allow the user to cancel
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 287 ENROLLED
and receive a full refund for a virtual currency kiosk transaction at any time if
the owner or operator was not licensed in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter at the time of the transaction.
C.(1) A virtual currency kiosk owner or operator shall acknowledge and
respond to a cancellation and refund request made pursuant to the provisions
of Subsection B of this Section within ten business days. A virtual currency
kiosk owner or operator's response shall clearly disclose all requirements for
a refund.
(2) For a refund request for suspected fraudulent activity, an owner or
operator may require a user to provide proof of a police report or other
governmental entity report of the suspected fraudulent activity and proof of
identification. Submitting either a police report or proof of a complaint
submitted to the Internet Crime Complaint Center to the owner or operator of
a virtual currency kiosk shall constitute suspected fraudulent activity.
(3) Any refund requested pursuant to this Subsection shall be processed
and completed either within ninety calendar days from the user's initial request
or ninety calendar days from when the user submitted proof of a police or other
governmental entity report of the suspected fraudulent activity and proof of
identification, if such requirements are part of the owner or operator's refund
policy and these requirements were clearly communicated to the user in
compliance with Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, whichever is later.
D. Each virtual currency kiosk owner or operator shall offer, during the
hours of operation of the virtual currency kiosk, live customer support by
telephone from a toll-free number prominently displayed on the virtual
currency kiosk. The toll-free number shall also be provided on the customer
receipt to a transaction as provided in R.S. 6:1393.1(H).
E. Each virtual currency kiosk owner or operator shall submit quarterly
reports to the commissioner of all cancellation and refund requests made by
residents pursuant to the provisions of this Section. The report shall include the
name and contact information of the customer who made the request, the
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 287 ENROLLED
transaction date, and the amount of the transaction that was requested to be
cancelled.
* * *
§1393.1. Required disclosures
* * *
E. When opening a new account, and prior to entering into an initial
transaction with, for, or on behalf of a resident, each licensee shall disclose in clear,
conspicuous, and legible writing in the English language all relevant terms and
conditions associated with its virtual currency products, services, and activities and
virtual currency generally, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(6) The resident's right to contact the office of financial institutions with
complaints or questions about the virtual currency kiosk operator's services.
The licensee shall include in this disclosure the telephone number for the office
of financial institutions.
(7) Any other disclosures as are customarily given in connection with the
opening of resident accounts.
F. Prior to each transaction in virtual currency with, for, or on behalf of a
resident, each licensee shall furnish to each such customer or account holder a
written disclosure in clear, conspicuous, and legible writing in the English language
containing the terms and conditions of the transaction, including but not limited to
the following:
* * *
(4) A notice that once executed, the transaction is not reversible may be
cancelled within seventy-two hours and a full refund may be received pursuant
to the provisions of R.S. 6:1389(B).
* * *
H. Upon completion of any transaction, each licensee shall provide to the
resident, both in paper and electronic form, a receipt containing all of the
following information:
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 287 ENROLLED
(1) The name and contact information of the licensee, including but not
limited to the licensee's business address and a customer service toll-free
telephone number established by the licensee to answer questions, to allow
residents to cancel transactions and receive a full refund for a virtual currency
kiosk transaction as provided in R.S. 6:1389(B), and to allow residents to register
complaints.
(2) The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction and the unique
identifier of the virtual currency kiosk operator.
(3) The full amount of each fee charged, including but not limited to a fee
charged directly or indirectly by the virtual currency kiosk operator or a third
party involved in the virtual currency transaction.
* * *
(6) A statement of the refund policy of the licensee in accordance with the
provisions of R.S. 6:1389.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.